Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.485

Power and authority of secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall have all power and authority reasonably necessary for the efficient and effective administration of this chapter, including the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1982 c 35 s 159; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 97.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Power and authority of secretary of state: RCW 23B.01.300.